apertium-mvf.mvf.lexc
! Morphological Transducer for mvf

Multichar_Symbols
! Part of speech categories
%<n%>         ! Noun
%<np%>        ! Proper noun
%<adj%>       ! Adjective
%<num%>       ! Numeral
%<prn%>       ! Pronoun
%<det%>       ! Determiner
%<v%>         ! Verb
%<vaux%>      ! Auxilary verb
%<adv%>       ! Adverb                     ! Наречие
%<post%>      ! Postposition
%<postadv%>   ! Postadverb
%<cnjcoo%>    ! Co-ordinating conjunction
%<cnjsub%>    ! Sub-ordinating conjunction
%<cnjadv%>    ! Adverbial conjunction
%<part%>      ! Particle
%<ij%>        ! Interjection
%<abbr%>      ! Abbreviation
%<cop%>       ! Copula

! Proper noun types
%<top%>       ! Toponym
%<ant%>       ! Anthroponym
%<cog%>       ! Cognomen
%<pat%>       ! Patronym     ! Отчество
%<org%>       ! Organization
%<al%>        ! Other

!! gender of anthroponyms and cognoms
%<m%>         ! Masculine
%<f%>         ! Feminine
%<mf%>        ! Masculine/feminine !# basically cognoms without -ов/-ова,
              ! -ин/-ина endings

! "Syntactic" tags. Attributive use of non-adjectives etc.
%<attr%>      ! Attributive
%<subst%>     ! Substantive
%<advl%>      ! Adverbial

! Number
%<sg%>        ! Singular
%<pl%>        ! Plural

! Possessives
%<px1sg%>     ! First person singular
%<px2sg%>     ! Second person singular
%<px3sp%>     ! Third person singular/plural
%<px1pl%>     ! First person plural
%<px2pl%>     ! Second person plural
%<px%>        ! General possessive

! Cases
%<nom%>       ! Nominative
%<gen%>       ! Genitive
%<gens%>      ! Short/clitic Genitive (used with nouns)
%<dat%>       ! Dative
%<acc%>       ! Accusative
%<abl%>       ! Ablative
%<loc%>       ! Locative
%<ins%>       ! Instrumental
%<dir%>       ! Directional

%<refl%>      ! Reflexive

!! some additional ~cases
%<sim%>       ! Similative (<apprx> in kymorph)
              !#
%<abe%>       ! Abessive=Privative ! Лишительный
              !#
%<reas%>      ! Reason

! Levels of comparison of adjectives
%<comp%>      ! Comparative
%<sup%>       ! Superlative

! Pronoun types
%<pers%>      ! Personal
%<recip%>     ! Reciprocal
! Pronoun and determiner types
%<dem%>       ! Demonstrative
%<ind%>       ! Indefinite
%<itg%>       ! Interrogative
%<qnt%>       ! Quantifier
%<neg%>       ! Negative       !# еш нерсе
              ! (NOTE: also used to denote negation in verbs, i.e for м{A})
%<ref%>       ! Reflexive

! Numeral types
%<ord%>       ! Ordinal
%<coll%>      ! Collective
%<dist%>      ! Distributive

! Verbal features

!! Mood
%<imp%>       ! Imperative
%<opt%>       ! Optative/jussive
%<sug%>       ! Suggestion

!! Derivation
%<caus%>      ! Causative
%<pass%>      ! Passive
%<coop%>      ! Cooperative

!! Tense / finite forms
%<pres%>      ! for "жатыр", "тұр", "отыр" and "жүр"
%<aor%>       ! -{E}                    ! non-past (afaik /IS/)
%<past%>      ! -{G}{A}н                ! past
%<ifi%>       ! -{D}{I}                 ! eyewitness past
%<hab%>       ! habitual
%<ifi_evid%>  ! -{I}пт{I}               ! "reported past" (afaik /IS/)
%<fut%>       ! -{I}р                   ! future
%<fut_plan%>  ! -{M}{A}{K}              ! future plan

%<evid%>      ! evidential
              ! The former is not handled here
              ! in lexc anymore, the latter was renamed from <ifi><evid> to
              ! <ifi_evid>

!! Non-Finite verb forms
%<gna%>       ! generic verbal adverb
%<gna_prf%>   ! perfective verbal adverb
%<gna_imp%>   ! imperfective verbal adverb
%<gna_cnd%>   ! conditional verbal adverb
%<gna2%>      ! "until" verbal adverb
%<ger%>       ! future gerund
%<ger_imp%>   ! imperfective gerund
%<ger_prf%>   ! perfective gerund

!!! Participles

!! Transitivity
%<tv%>        ! Transitive
%<iv%>        ! Intransitive
%<TD%>        ! Temporary tag

! Person
%<p1%>        ! First person
%<p2%>        ! Second person
%<p3%>        ! Third person
%<frm%>       ! Formality
%<infm%>      ! Informal

! Modal particles
%<qst%>       ! Modal question particle
%<mod_foc%>   ! "Particles of politeness and ardent desire"
              ! (as in [N. Poppe. Tatar Manual]) or
              ! "what about ..." question particles" :)
              ! (as in kir.lexc)
%<mod_ass%>   ! Assertive modal particle
%<mod%>       ! Modal verbs (шығар, сияқты etc)

! Punctuation
%<sent%>      ! Sentence marker
%<guio%>      ! Hyphen
%<cm%>        ! Comma
%<apos%>      ! Apostrophe
%<rquot%>     ! Quote marker (right hand side)
%<lquot%>     ! Quote marker (left hand side)
%<rpar%>      ! Parenthetical marker (right hand side)
%<lpar%>      ! Parenthetical marker (left hand side)

!
%{k%}

%>            ! Morpheme boundary
!%             ! Space
%-            !
%,            !
%.            !
%%            !
%+            ! clitic space

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root

Nouns ;
Verbs ;
Pronouns ;
Conjunctions ;
Adverbs ;
Adjectives ;
Postpositions ;
Postadverbs ;
Determiners ;
Numbers ;
Particles ;
ProperNouns ;
Punctuation ;


LEXICON Clit-Qst
+ᠪᠣᠢ%<qst%>:% %{В%}э # ;         ! wh-question
+ᠤᠤ%<qst%>:% %{У%}%{У%} # ;     ! yes/no-question

LEXICON Clit-NonQst

+даа%<qst%>:% д%{А1%}%{А2%} # ;   !
+аа%<qst%>:% %{А1%}%{А2%} # ;     !
+билээ%<qst%>:% билээ # ;       ! assumed previously known information (?)


LEXICON Clit
! Sentence-final clitics

# ;
Clit-Qst ;
Clit-NonQst ;


LEXICON Cases-Normal

%<nom%>: Clit ;
%<acc%>:%>%{I%}%{й%}г Clit ;

%<nom%>%<refl%>:%>%{г%}%{А1%}%{А2%} Clit ;  ! this is both nom and acc

%<gen%>:%>%{г%}%{I%}%{й%}н Clit ;
%<gen%>%<refl%>:%>%{г%}%{I%}%{й%}нх%>%{А1%}%{А2%} Clit ;

%<abl%>:%>%{г%}%{А1%}%{А2%}с Clit ;
%<abl%>%<refl%>:%>%{г%}%{А1%}%{А2%}с%{А1%}%{А2%} Clit ;

%<ins%>:%>%{г%}%{А1%}%{А2%}р Clit ;
%<ins%>%<refl%>:%>%{г%}%{А1%}%{А2%}р%>%{А1%}%{А2%} Clit ;

%<dat%>:%>%{а%}%{Д%} Clit ;               ! (with exceptional forms in т)
%<dat%>%<refl%>:%>д%{А1%}%{А2%} Clit ;    ! (with exceptional forms in т)

%<dat%>%<attr%>:% д%{А%}х%{ь%} Clit ;

%<gens%>:%>%{а%}н # ;

%<dir%>:%>% %{Р%}%{У%}%{У%} Clit ;


LEXICON Cases-ExtraN

%<nom%>: Clit ;
%<acc%>:%>%{I%}%{й%}г Clit ;

%<refl%>:%>%{г%}%{А1%}%{А2%} Clit ;  ! this is both nom and acc

%<gen%>:%>%{Н%}%{I%}%{й%} Clit ;
%<gen%>%<refl%>:%>%{Н%}%{I%}%{й%}х%>%{А1%}%{А2%} Clit ;

%<abl%>:%>%{Н%}%{А1%}%{А2%}с Clit ;
%<abl%>%<refl%>:%>%{Н%}%{А1%}%{А2%}с%>%{А1%}%{А2%} Clit ;

%<ins%>:%>%{Н%}%{А1%}%{А2%}р Clit ;
%<ins%>%<refl%>:%>%{Н%}%{А1%}%{А2%}р%>%{А1%}%{А2%} Clit ;

%<dat%>:%>%{а%}%{Н%}д Clit ;               ! (with exceptional forms in т)
%<dat%>%<refl%>:%>%{Н%}д%{А1%}%{А2%} Clit ;  ! (with exceptional forms in т)

%<dat%>%<attr%>:%{а%}%{Н%}% д%{А%}х%{ь%} Clit ;

%<gens%>:%>%{а%}н # ;

%<dir%>:%>% %{Р%}%{У%}%{У%} Clit ;

LEXICON PrnInfl

%<prn%>: Cases-Normal ;

LEXICON DetInfl

%<det%>: # ;

LEXICON Ninfl

%<n%>: Cases-Normal ;
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>%{н%}%{У%}%{У%}д Cases-Normal ;

LEXICON Ninfl-Person

%<n%>: Cases-Normal ;
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>% нар Cases-Normal ;

LEXICON Ninfl-NoPl

%<n%>: Cases-Normal ;

LEXICON Ninfl-Pl

%<n%>%<pl%>: Cases-Normal ;


LEXICON Ninfl-ExtraN

%<n%>: Cases-ExtraN ;
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>н%{У%}%{У%}д Cases-Normal ;

LEXICON Ninfl-ExtraN-NoPl

%<n%>: Cases-ExtraN ;

LEXICON NP-COG-M

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>: Cases-Normal ;

LEXICON NP-ORG

%<np%>%<org%>: Cases-Normal ;
%<np%>%<org%>%<attr%>: # ;


LEXICON NP-TOP

%<np%>%<top%>: Cases-Normal ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<attr%>: # ;

LEXICON Pronouns
ᠪᠢ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ᠨᠠᠮᠠᠢ Clit ;
ᠪᠢ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ᠮᠢᠨᠦ Clit ;
ᠪᠢ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:ᠨᠠᠳᠠ ᠠᠴᠠ Clit ;
ᠪᠢ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ᠨᠠᠳᠠ ᠳᠤ Clit ;
ᠪᠢ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:ᠨᠠᠳᠠ ᠪᠠᠷ Clit ;
ᠪᠢ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<px%>:ᠮᠢᠨᠦᠬᠢ Clit ;
ᠪᠢ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<gens%>:ᠮᠢᠨᠢ Clit ;
ᠪᠢᠳᠡ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ᠪᠢᠳᠡ Clit ;
ᠪᠢᠳᠡ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:ᠪᠢᠳᠡᠨ ᠢ Clit ;
ᠪᠢᠳᠡ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:ᠪᠢᠳᠡᠨ ᠦ Clit ;
ᠪᠢᠳᠡ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:ᠪᠢᠳᠡᠨ ᠡᠴᠡ Clit ;
ᠪᠢᠳᠡ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:ᠪᠢᠳᠡᠨ ᠳᠦ Clit ;
ᠪᠢᠳᠡ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:ᠪᠢᠳᠡᠨ ᠢᠶᠡᠷ Clit ;
ᠪᠢᠳᠡ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<px%>:ᠪᠢᠳᠡᠨ ᠦ ᠬᠢ Clit ;
ᠴᠢ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ᠴᠢ Clit ;
ᠴᠢ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ᠴᠢᠮᠠᠢ Clit ;
ᠴᠢ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ᠴᠢᠨᠤ Clit ;
ᠴᠢ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:ᠴᠢᠮ᠎ᠠ ᠠᠴᠠ Clit ;
ᠴᠢ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ᠴᠢᠮ᠎ᠠ ᠳᠤ Clit ;
ᠴᠢ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:ᠴᠢᠮ᠎ᠠ ᠪᠠᠷ Clit ;
ᠴᠢ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<gens%>:ᠴᠢᠨᠢ Clit ;
ᠲᠠ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<acc%>:ᠲᠠᠨ ᠢ Clit ;
ᠲᠠ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<dat%>:ᠲᠠᠨ ᠳᠤ Clit ;
ᠲᠠ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<gens%>:ᠲᠠᠨᠢ Clit ;
ᠲᠡᠷᠡ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ᠲᠡᠭᠦᠨ ᠢ Clit ;
ᠲᠡᠷᠡ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:ᠲᠡᠭᠦᠨ ᠡᠴᠡ Clit ;
ᠲᠡᠷᠡ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ᠲᠡᠭᠦᠨ ᠳᠦ Clit ;
ᠲᠡᠷᠡ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<px%>:ᠲᠡᠭᠦᠨ ᠦ ᠬᠢ Clit ;
ᠲᠡᠳᠡ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ᠲᠡᠳᠡ Clit ;
ᠲᠡᠳᠡ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:ᠲᠡᠳᠡᠨ ᠦ Clit ;
ᠲᠡᠳᠡ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:ᠲᠡᠳᠡᠨ ᠳᠦ Clit ;
ᠲᠡᠳᠡ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<px%>:ᠲᠡᠳᠡᠨ ᠦ ᠬᠢ Clit ;
ᠬᠡᠨ PrnInfl ;            ! "who"
ᠤᠤ PrnInfl ;             ! "what"
ᠥᠭᠡᠷ᠎ᠡ PrnInfl ;            ! "oneself"
ᠡᠨᠡ:ᠡᠨᠡ PrnInfl ;         ! "this one"
ᠶᠠᠮᠠᠷ:ᠶᠠᠮ᠎ᠠ%{а%}р PrnInfl ;  ! "which one"
ᠲᠡᠶᠢᠮᠦ:ᠲᠡᠶᠢᠮᠦ PrnInfl ;      ! "one like that"
ᠡᠶᠢᠮᠦ:ᠡᠶᠢᠮᠦ PrnInfl ;        ! "one like this"
ᠪᠦᠭᠦᠳᠡ:ᠪᠦᠭᠦᠳᠡ PrnInfl ;      ! "everyone"
LEXICON Nouns
ᠴᠠᠭ:ᠴᠠᠭ Ninfl-ExtraN ; ! "watch/clock"
ᠪᠠᠩᠬᠢ:ᠪᠠᠩᠬᠢ Ninfl ; ! "bank"
ᠠᠯᠠᠭ᠎ᠠ:ᠠᠯᠠᠭ᠎ᠠ Ninfl-ExtraN ; ! "palm"
ᠨᠢᠳᠦ:ᠨᠢᠳᠦ Ninfl-ExtraN ; ! "eye"
ᠮᠣᠳᠣ:ᠮᠣᠳᠣ Ninfl-ExtraN-NoPl ; ! "tree"
ᠮᠣᠳᠣ:ᠮᠣᠳᠣᠳ Ninfl-Pl ; ! "trees"
ᠠᠬ᠎ᠠ:ᠠᠬ᠎ᠠ Ninfl ; ! "older brother"
ᠳᠡᠭᠦᠦ:ᠳᠡᠭᠦᠦ Ninfl-Person ; ! "younger sibling"
ᠰᠠᠨᠳᠠᠯᠢ:ᠰᠠᠨᠳᠠᠯᠢ Ninfl ; ! "chair"
ᠰᠠᠪᠠ:ᠰᠠᠪᠠ Ninfl ; ! "container"
ᠬᠠᠭᠠᠯᠭ᠎ᠠ:ᠬᠠᠭᠠᠯᠭ᠎ᠠ Ninfl ; ! "door"
ᠬᠣᠭᠣᠯᠠ:ᠬᠣᠭᠣᠯᠠ Ninfl-ExtraN ; ! "food"
ᠨᠠᠶᠢᠵᠠ:ᠨᠠᠶᠢᠵᠠ Ninfl ; ! "friend"
ᠠᠳᠤᠭᠤ:ᠠᠳᠤᠭᠤ Ninfl ; ! "(herd) horse"
ᠳᠠᠭᠤᠤ:ᠳᠠᠭᠤᠤ Ninfl-ExtraN ; ! "song"
ᠮᠠᠯ:ᠮᠠᠯ Ninfl ; ! "livestock"
ᠤᠤᠯ:ᠤᠤᠯ Ninfl-ExtraN ; ! "mountain"
ᠳ᠋ᠤᠭᠠᠷ:ᠳ᠋ᠤᠭᠠᠷ Ninfl ; ! "number"
ᠭᠠᠬᠠᠢ:ᠭᠠᠬᠠᠢ Ninfl-ExtraN ; ! "pig"
ᠠᠶᠢᠮᠠᠭ:ᠠᠶᠢᠮᠠᠭ Ninfl ; ! "aimag (province)"
ᠬᠣᠨᠢ:ᠬᠣᠨᠢ Ninfl ; ! "shirt"
ᠬᠠᠯᠪᠠᠭ᠎ᠠ:ᠬᠠᠯᠪᠠᠭ᠎ᠠ Ninfl ; ! "spoon"
ᠰᠢᠷᠡᠭᠡ:ᠰᠢᠷᠡᠭᠡ Ninfl-ExtraN ; ! "table"
ᠡᠬᠡᠨᠡᠷ:ᠡᠬᠡᠨᠡᠷ Ninfl ; ! "wife"
ᠲᠡᠮᠡᠭᠡ:ᠲᠡᠮᠡᠭᠡ Ninfl-ExtraN ; ! "camel"
ᠵᠢᠭᠠᠨ:ᠵᠢᠭᠠᠨ Ninfl ; ! "elephant"
ᠬᠦᠮᠦᠨ:ᠬᠦᠮᠦᠨ Ninfl-NoPl ; ! "person"
ᠬᠦᠮᠦᠨ:ᠬᠦᠮᠦᠰ Ninfl-Pl ; ! "person"
ᠦᠶ᠎ᠡ:ᠦᠶ᠎ᠡ Ninfl-ExtraN ; ! "joint"
ᠭᠡᠷ:ᠭᠡᠷ Ninfl ; ! "home"
ᠲᠣᠯᠣᠭᠠᠢ:ᠲᠣᠯᠣᠭᠠᠢ Ninfl-ExtraN ; ! "head"
ᠪᠠᠶᠠᠷ:ᠪᠠᠶᠠᠷ Ninfl ; ! "happiness/luck/fortune"
ᠮᠢᠬ᠎ᠠ:ᠮᠢᠬ᠎ᠠ Ninfl-ExtraN ; ! "meat"
ᠴᠠᠢ:ᠴᠠᠢ Ninfl-ExtraN ; ! "tea"
ᠰᠦ᠋:ᠰᠦ᠋ Ninfl ; ! "milk"
ᠭᠥᠷ ᠡᠴᠡ Ninfl-ExtraN ; ! "~gazelle"
ᠥᠷᠥᠭᠡ:ᠥᠷᠥᠭᠡ Ninfl-ExtraN ; ! "room"
ᠰᠠᠷ᠎ᠠ:ᠰᠠᠷ᠎ᠠ Ninfl-ExtraN ; ! "moon"
ᠮᠡᠯᠡᠬᠡᠢ:ᠮᠡᠯᠡᠬᠡᠢ Ninfl-ExtraN ; ! "turtle"
ᠥᠭᠦᠯᠡᠯ:ᠦᠭᠦᠯᠡ%{а%}л Ninfl ; ! "speech/presentation"
ᠠᠮᠢᠲᠠᠨ:ᠠᠮᠢ ᠳᠤ%{а%}н Ninfl-NoPl ; ! "animal"
ᠲᠡᠷᠭᠡ:ᠲᠡᠷᠭᠡ Ninfl ; ! "cart/wagon"
ᠬᠠᠭᠠᠨ:ᠬᠠᠭᠠᠨ Ninfl ; ! "king"
ᠵᠠᠰᠠᠭ:ᠵᠠᠰᠠᠭ Ninfl ; ! "government"
ᠠᠮᠵᠢᠯᠲᠠ:ᠠᠮᠵᠢᠯᠲᠠ Ninfl ; ! "success"
ᠡᠬᠡ:ᠡᠬᠡ Ninfl-ExtraN ; ! "beginning"
ᠣᠷᠣᠰᠢᠯ:ᠣᠷᠣᠰᠢᠯ Ninfl ; ! "introduction, preamble"
ᠮᠥᠩᠭᠥ:ᠮᠥᠩᠭᠥ Ninfl ; ! "money, silver"
ᠨᠤᠲᠤᠭ:ᠨᠤᠲᠤᠭ Ninfl ; ! "homeland"
ᠰᠣᠷᠢᠨᠵᠢ:ᠰᠣᠷᠢᠨᠵᠢ  Ninfl-ExtraN ; ! "magnet"
ᠨᠠᠷᠠ:ᠨᠠᠷᠠ Ninfl-ExtraN ; ! "sun"
ᠬᠠᠳᠠ:ᠬᠠᠳᠠ Ninfl-ExtraN ; ! "wall of stone, roof, cliff"
ᠡᠷᠭᠢ:ᠡᠷᠭᠢ Ninfl ; ! "shore, coast"
ᠬᠢᠷᠢ:ᠬᠢᠷᠢ Ninfl-ExtraN ; ! "dirt"
ᠬᠣᠣᠷ:ᠬᠣᠣᠷ Ninfl-ExtraN ; ! "poison"
ᠬᠡᠭᠦᠷ:ᠬᠡᠭᠦᠷ Ninfl-ExtraN ; ! "dead body"
ᠬᠡᠯᠡ:ᠬᠡᠯᠡ Ninfl ; ! "tongue, language"
ᠢᠷ:ᠢᠷ Ninfl-ExtraN ; ! "blade"
ᠥᠷᠥ:ᠥᠷᠥ Ninfl-ExtraN ; ! "debt"
ᠦᠦᠷ:ᠦᠦᠷ Ninfl-ExtraN ; ! "nest"
ᠥᠭᠡᠷ᠎ᠡ:ᠥᠭᠡᠷ᠎ᠡ Ninfl ; ! "other"
ᠠᠭᠤᠷ:ᠠᠭᠤᠷ Ninfl-ExtraN ; ! "vapor"
ᠡᠭᠦᠯᠡ:ᠡᠭᠦᠯᠡ Ninfl-ExtraN ; ! "cloud"
ᠦᠢᠯᠡ:ᠦᠢᠯᠡ Ninfl-ExtraN ; ! "deed/action?"
ᠪᠠᠭᠠᠲᠤᠷ:ᠪᠠᠭᠠᠲᠤᠷ Ninfl ; ! "hero"
ᠡᠩᠬᠡ:ᠡᠩᠬᠡ Ninfl ; ! "peace"
ᠵᠦᠵᠦᠭᠡ:ᠵᠦᠵᠦᠭᠡ Ninfl ; ! "drama"
ᠰᠥᠨᠢ:ᠰᠥᠨᠢ Ninfl ; ! "night"
